Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
Penalties

421.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates or enters a conspiracy to violate KRS

421.080

shall be fined not less than thirty dollars ($30) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or both.

In addition to the penalty prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, a practicing attorney who violates subsection (2) of KRS

421.080

may be disbarred, whether convicted under subsection (1) or not.

History.

4866a-1 to 4866a-3.